Utah statutes.
19-3-103.7.   Prohibition of certain radioactive wastes.
No entity may accept in the state or apply for a license to accept in the
state for commercial storage, decay in storage, treatment, incineration, or
disposal:
(1)  class B or class C low-level radioactive waste; or
(2)  radioactive waste having a higher radionuclide concentration than the
highest radionuclide concentration allowed under licenses existing on February
25, 2005, that have met all the requirements of Section 19-3-105.
